engine/dictionaries/is/is.aff
FLAG num
# Lýsingarorðsbeyging 01 frumstig
SFX 294 N 53
SFX 294 tur t .	19
SFX 294 gur g .	19
SFX 294 kur k .	19
SFX 294 ur t .	20
SFX 294 ur ir .	21
SFX 294 ur ar .	22
SFX 294 tur t .	23
SFX 294 gur g .	23
SFX 294 kur k .	23
SFX 294 ur an .	24
SFX 294 ur a .	25
SFX 294 ur t .	26
SFX 294 ur a .	27
SFX 294 ur ar .	28
SFX 294 tur t .	29
SFX 294 gur g .	29
SFX 294 kur k .	29
SFX 294 r m .	30
SFX 294 ur ri .	31
SFX 294 ur u .	32
SFX 294 r m .	33
SFX 294 r m .	34
SFX 294 r m .	35
SFX 294 ur s .	36
SFX 294 ur rar .	37
SFX 294 ur s .	38
SFX 294 ur ra .	39
SFX 294 ur ra .	40
SFX 294 ur ra .	41
SFX 294 ur i .	42
SFX 294 ur a .	43
SFX 294 ur a .	44
SFX 294 ur u .	45
SFX 294 ur u .	46
SFX 294 ur u .	47
SFX 294 ur a .	48
SFX 294 ur u .	49
SFX 294 ur a .	50
SFX 294 ur u .	51
SFX 294 ur u .	52
SFX 294 ur u .	53
SFX 294 ur a .	54
SFX 294 ur u .	55
SFX 294 ur a .	56
SFX 294 ur u .	57
SFX 294 ur u .	58
SFX 294 ur u .	59
SFX 294 ur a .	60
SFX 294 ur u .	61
SFX 294 ur a .	62
SFX 294 ur u .	63
SFX 294 ur u .	64
SFX 294 ur u .	65

# Lýsingarorðsbeyging 01 t
SFX 295 N 124
SFX 295 ður ð .	19
SFX 295 dur d .	19
SFX 295 ður t .	20
SFX 295 dur t .	20
SFX 295 ur ir .	21
SFX 295 ur ar .	22
SFX 295 ður ð .	23
SFX 295 dur d .	23
SFX 295 ur an .	24
SFX 295 ur a .	25
SFX 295 ður t .	26
SFX 295 dur t .	26
SFX 295 ur a .	27
SFX 295 ur ar .	28
SFX 295 ður ð .	29
SFX 295 dur d .	29
SFX 295 r m .	30
SFX 295 ur ri .	31
SFX 295 ur u .	32
SFX 295 r m .	33
SFX 295 r m .	34
SFX 295 r m .	35
SFX 295 ur s .	36
SFX 295 ur rar .	37
SFX 295 ur s .	38
SFX 295 ur ra .	39
SFX 295 ur ra .	40
SFX 295 ur ra .	41
SFX 295 ur i .	42
SFX 295 ur a .	43
SFX 295 ur a .	44
SFX 295 ur u .	45
SFX 295 ur u .	46
SFX 295 ur u .	47
SFX 295 ur a .	48
SFX 295 ur u .	49
SFX 295 ur a .	50
SFX 295 ur u .	51
SFX 295 ur u .	52
SFX 295 ur u .	53
SFX 295 ur a .	54
SFX 295 ur u .	55
SFX 295 ur a .	56
SFX 295 ur u .	57
SFX 295 ur u .	58
SFX 295 ur u .	59
SFX 295 ur a .	60
SFX 295 ur u .	61
SFX 295 ur a .	62
SFX 295 ur u .	63
SFX 295 ur u .	64
SFX 295 ur u .	65
SFX 295 ur ari .	66
SFX 295 ur ari .	67
SFX 295 ur ara .	68
SFX 295 ur ari .	69
SFX 295 ur ari .	70
SFX 295 ur ari .	71
SFX 295 ur ari .	72
SFX 295 ur ari .	73
SFX 295 ur ara .	74
SFX 295 ur ari .	75
SFX 295 ur ari .	76
SFX 295 ur ari .	77
SFX 295 ur ari .	78
SFX 295 ur ari .	79
SFX 295 ur ara .	80
SFX 295 ur ari .	81
SFX 295 ur ari .	82
SFX 295 ur ari .	83
SFX 295 ur ari .	84
SFX 295 ur ari .	85
SFX 295 ur ara .	86
SFX 295 ur ari .	87
SFX 295 ur ari .	88
SFX 295 ur ari .	89
SFX 295 ur astur .	90
SFX 295 r st .	91
SFX 295 ur ast .	92
SFX 295 ur astir .	93
SFX 295 ur astar .	94
SFX 295 r st .	95
SFX 295 ur astan .	96
SFX 295 ur asta .	97
SFX 295 ur ast .	98
SFX 295 ur asta .	99
SFX 295 ur astar .	100
SFX 295 r st .	101
SFX 295 r stum .	102
SFX 295 ur astri .	103
SFX 295 r stu .	104
SFX 295 r stum .	105
SFX 295 r stum .	106
SFX 295 r stum .	107
SFX 295 ur asts .	108
SFX 295 ur astrar .	109
SFX 295 ur asts .	110
SFX 295 ur astra .	111
SFX 295 ur astra .	112
SFX 295 ur astra .	113
SFX 295 ur asti .	114
SFX 295 ur asta .	115
SFX 295 ur asta .	116
SFX 295 r stu .	117
SFX 295 r stu .	118
SFX 295 r stu .	119
SFX 295 ur asta .	120
SFX 295 r stu .	121
SFX 295 ur asta .	122
SFX 295 r stu .	123
SFX 295 r stu .	124
SFX 295 r stu .	125
SFX 295 ur asta .	126
SFX 295 r stu .	127
SFX 295 ur asta .	128
SFX 295 r stu .	129
SFX 295 r stu .	130
SFX 295 r stu .	131
SFX 295 ur asta .	132
SFX 295 r stu .	133
SFX 295 ur asta .	134
SFX 295 r stu .	135
SFX 295 r stu .	136
SFX 295 r stu .	137

# Lýsingarorðsbeyging 01 t frumstig
SFX 296 N 47
SFX 296 dur d .	19
SFX 296 dur t .	20
SFX 296 ur ir .	21
SFX 296 ur ar .	22
SFX 296 dur d .	23
SFX 296 ur an .	24
SFX 296 ur a .	25
SFX 296 dur t .	26
SFX 296 ur a .	27
SFX 296 ur ar .	28
SFX 296 dur d .	29
SFX 296 r m .	30
SFX 296 ur ri .	31
SFX 296 ur u .	32
SFX 296 r m .	33
SFX 296 r m .	34
SFX 296 r m .	35
SFX 296 ur s .	36
SFX 296 ur rar .	37
SFX 296 ur s .	38
SFX 296 ur ra .	39
SFX 296 ur ra .	40
SFX 296 ur ra .	41
SFX 296 ur i .	42
SFX 296 ur a .	43
SFX 296 ur a .	44
SFX 296 ur u .	45
SFX 296 ur u .	46
SFX 296 ur u .	47
SFX 296 ur a .	48
SFX 296 ur u .	49
SFX 296 ur a .	50
SFX 296 ur u .	51
SFX 296 ur u .	52
SFX 296 ur u .	53
SFX 296 ur a .	54
SFX 296 ur u .	55
SFX 296 ur a .	56
SFX 296 ur u .	57
SFX 296 ur u .	58
SFX 296 ur u .	59
SFX 296 ur a .	60
SFX 296 ur u .	61
SFX 296 ur a .	62
SFX 296 ur u .	63
SFX 296 ur u .	64
SFX 296 ur u .	65

# Lýsingarorðsbeyging 01 t ö
SFX 297 N 167
SFX 297 arður örð .	19
SFX 297 aldur öld .	19
SFX 297 ður t .	20
SFX 297 dur t .	20
SFX 297 ur ir .	21
SFX 297 ur ar .	22
SFX 297 arður örð .	23
SFX 297 aldur öld .	23
SFX 297 ur an .	24
SFX 297 ur a .	25
SFX 297 ður t .	26
SFX 297 dur t .	26
SFX 297 ur a .	27
SFX 297 ur ar .	28
SFX 297 arður örð .	29
SFX 297 aldur öld .	29
SFX 297 arður örðum .	30
SFX 297 aldur öldum .	30
SFX 297 ur ri .	31
SFX 297 arður örðu .	32
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	32
SFX 297 arður örðum .	33
SFX 297 aldur öldum .	33
SFX 297 arður örðum .	34
SFX 297 aldur öldum .	34
SFX 297 arður örðum .	35
SFX 297 aldur öldum .	35
SFX 297 ur s .	36
SFX 297 ur rar .	37
SFX 297 ur s .	38
SFX 297 ur ra .	39
SFX 297 ur ra .	40
SFX 297 ur ra .	41
SFX 297 ur i .	42
SFX 297 ur a .	43
SFX 297 ur a .	44
SFX 297 arður örðu .	45
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	45
SFX 297 arður örðu .	46
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	46
SFX 297 arður örðu .	47
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	47
SFX 297 ur a .	48
SFX 297 arður örðu .	49
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	49
SFX 297 ur a .	50
SFX 297 arður örðu .	51
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	51
SFX 297 arður örðu .	52
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	52
SFX 297 arður örðu .	53
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	53
SFX 297 ur a .	54
SFX 297 arður örðu .	55
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	55
SFX 297 ur a .	56
SFX 297 arður örðu .	57
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	57
SFX 297 arður örðu .	58
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	58
SFX 297 arður örðu .	59
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	59
SFX 297 ur a .	60
SFX 297 arður örðu .	61
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	61
SFX 297 ur a .	62
SFX 297 arður örðu .	63
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	63
SFX 297 arður örðu .	64
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	64
SFX 297 arður örðu .	65
SFX 297 aldur öldu .	65
SFX 297 ur ari .	66
SFX 297 ur ari .	67
SFX 297 ur ara .	68
SFX 297 ur ari .	69
SFX 297 ur ari .	70
SFX 297 ur ari .	71
SFX 297 ur ari .	72
SFX 297 ur ari .	73
SFX 297 ur ara .	74
SFX 297 ur ari .	75
SFX 297 ur ari .	76
SFX 297 ur ari .	77
SFX 297 ur ari .	78
SFX 297 ur ari .	79
SFX 297 ur ara .	80
SFX 297 ur ari .	81
SFX 297 ur ari .	82
SFX 297 ur ari .	83
SFX 297 ur ari .	84
SFX 297 ur ari .	85
SFX 297 ur ara .	86
SFX 297 ur ari .	87
SFX 297 ur ari .	88
SFX 297 ur ari .	89
SFX 297 ur astur .	90
SFX 297 arður örðust .	91
SFX 297 aldur öldust .	91
SFX 297 ur ast .	92
SFX 297 ur astir .	93
SFX 297 ur astar .	94
SFX 297 arður örðust .	95
SFX 297 aldur öldust .	95
SFX 297 ur astan .	96
SFX 297 ur asta .	97
SFX 297 ur ast .	98
SFX 297 ur asta .	99
SFX 297 ur astar .	100
SFX 297 arður örðust .	101
SFX 297 aldur öldust .	101
SFX 297 arður örðustum .	102
SFX 297 aldur öldustum .	102
SFX 297 ur astri .	103
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	104
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	104
SFX 297 arður örðustum .	105
SFX 297 aldur öldustum .	105
SFX 297 arður örðustum .	106
SFX 297 aldur öldustum .	106
SFX 297 arður örðustum .	107
SFX 297 aldur öldustum .	107
SFX 297 ur asts .	108
SFX 297 ur astrar .	109
SFX 297 ur asts .	110
SFX 297 ur astra .	111
SFX 297 ur astra .	112
SFX 297 ur astra .	113
SFX 297 ur asti .	114
SFX 297 ur asta .	115
SFX 297 ur asta .	116
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	117
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	117
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	118
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	118
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	119
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	119
SFX 297 ur asta .	120
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	121
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	121
SFX 297 ur asta .	122
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	123
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	123
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	124
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	124
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	125
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	125
SFX 297 ur asta .	126
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	127
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	127
SFX 297 ur asta .	128
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	129
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	129
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	130
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	130
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	131
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	131
SFX 297 ur asta .	132
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	133
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	133
SFX 297 ur asta .	134
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	135
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	135
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	136
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	136
SFX 297 arður örðustu .	137
SFX 297 aldur öldustu .	137

# Lýsingarorðsbeyging 01 tt
SFX 298 N 124
SFX 298 ður ð .	19
SFX 298 dur d .	19
SFX 298 ður tt .	20
SFX 298 ddur tt .	20
SFX 298 ur ir .	21
SFX 298 ur ar .	22
SFX 298 ður ð .	23
SFX 298 dur d .	23
SFX 298 ur an .	24
SFX 298 ur a .	25
SFX 298 ður tt .	26
SFX 298 ddur tt .	26
SFX 298 ur a .	27
SFX 298 ur ar .	28
SFX 298 ður ð .	29
SFX 298 dur d .	29
SFX 298 r m .	30
SFX 298 ur ri .	31
SFX 298 ur u .	32
SFX 298 r m .	33
SFX 298 r m .	34
SFX 298 r m .	35
SFX 298 ur s .	36
SFX 298 ur rar .	37
SFX 298 ur s .	38
SFX 298 ur ra .	39
SFX 298 ur ra .	40
SFX 298 ur ra .	41
SFX 298 ur i .	42
SFX 298 ur a .	43
SFX 298 ur a .	44
SFX 298 ur u .	45
SFX 298 ur u .	46
SFX 298 ur u .	47
SFX 298 ur a .	48
SFX 298 ur u .	49
SFX 298 ur a .	50
SFX 298 ur u .	51
SFX 298 ur u .	52
SFX 298 ur u .	53
SFX 298 ur a .	54
SFX 298 ur u .	55
SFX 298 ur a .	56
SFX 298 ur u .	57
SFX 298 ur u .	58
SFX 298 ur u .	59
SFX 298 ur a .	60
SFX 298 ur u .	61
SFX 298 ur a .	62
SFX 298 ur u .	63
SFX 298 ur u .	64
SFX 298 ur u .	65
SFX 298 ur ari .	66
SFX 298 ur ari .	67
SFX 298 ur ara .	68
SFX 298 ur ari .	69
SFX 298 ur ari .	70
SFX 298 ur ari .	71
SFX 298 ur ari .	72
SFX 298 ur ari .	73
SFX 298 ur ara .	74
SFX 298 ur ari .	75
SFX 298 ur ari .	76
SFX 298 ur ari .	77
SFX 298 ur ari .	78
SFX 298 ur ari .	79
SFX 298 ur ara .	80
SFX 298 ur ari .	81
SFX 298 ur ari .	82
SFX 298 ur ari .	83
SFX 298 ur ari .	84
SFX 298 ur ari .	85
SFX 298 ur ara .	86
SFX 298 ur ari .	87
SFX 298 ur ari .	88
SFX 298 ur ari .	89
SFX 298 ur astur .	90
SFX 298 r st .	91
SFX 298 ur ast .	92
SFX 298 ur astir .	93
SFX 298 ur astar .	94
SFX 298 r st .	95
SFX 298 ur astan .	96
SFX 298 ur asta .	97
SFX 298 ur ast .	98
SFX 298 ur asta .	99
SFX 298 ur astar .	100
SFX 298 r st .	101
SFX 298 r stum .	102
SFX 298 ur astri .	103
SFX 298 r stu .	104
SFX 298 r stum .	105
SFX 298 r stum .	106
SFX 298 r stum .	107
SFX 298 ur asts .	108
SFX 298 ur astrar .	109
SFX 298 ur asts .	110
SFX 298 ur astra .	111
SFX 298 ur astra .	112
SFX 298 ur astra .	113
SFX 298 ur asti .	114
SFX 298 ur asta .	115
SFX 298 ur asta .	116
SFX 298 r stu .	117
SFX 298 r stu .	118
SFX 298 r stu .	119
SFX 298 ur asta .	120
SFX 298 r stu .	121
SFX 298 ur asta .	122
SFX 298 r stu .	123
SFX 298 r stu .	124
SFX 298 r stu .	125
SFX 298 ur asta .	126
SFX 298 r stu .	127
SFX 298 ur asta .	128
SFX 298 r stu .	129
SFX 298 r stu .	130
SFX 298 r stu .	131
SFX 298 ur asta .	132
SFX 298 r stu .	133
SFX 298 ur asta .	134
SFX 298 r stu .	135
SFX 298 r stu .	136
SFX 298 r stu .	137

# Lýsingarorðsbeyging 01 tt frumstig
SFX 299 N 47
SFX 299 ður ð .	19
SFX 299 ður tt .	20
SFX 299 ur ir .	21
SFX 299 ur ar .	22
SFX 299 ður ð .	23
SFX 299 ur an .	24
SFX 299 ur a .	25
SFX 299 ður tt .	26
SFX 299 ur a .	27
SFX 299 ur ar .	28
SFX 299 ður ð .	29
SFX 299 r m .	30
SFX 299 ur ri .	31
SFX 299 ur u .	32
SFX 299 r m .	33
SFX 299 r m .	34
SFX 299 r m .	35
SFX 299 ur s .	36
SFX 299 ur rar .	37
SFX 299 ur s .	38
SFX 299 ur ra .	39
SFX 299 ur ra .	40
SFX 299 ur ra .	41
SFX 299 ur i .	42
SFX 299 ur a .	43
SFX 299 ur a .	44
SFX 299 ur u .	45
SFX 299 ur u .	46
SFX 299 ur u .	47
SFX 299 ur a .	48
SFX 299 ur u .	49
SFX 299 ur a .	50
SFX 299 ur u .	51
SFX 299 ur u .	52
SFX 299 ur u .	53
SFX 299 ur a .	54
SFX 299 ur u .	55
SFX 299 ur a .	56
SFX 299 ur u .	57
SFX 299 ur u .	58
SFX 299 ur u .	59
SFX 299 ur a .	60
SFX 299 ur u .	61
SFX 299 ur a .	62
SFX 299 ur u .	63
SFX 299 ur u .	64
SFX 299 ur u .	65
